Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB765.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 407(a)(2), 415(a)(4), (8) and (9) and 442(a)(1)(ii) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, are amended to read:Section 407. Sale of Malt or Brewed Beverages by Liquor 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Licensees.--(a) * * *(2) If a restaurant liquor license holder has an interior connection to another business that it operates, the restaurant liquor license holder may use one or more of the registers in the other business to sell malt or brewed beverages for off-premises consumption under the following conditions:[(i) the building is eleven thousand square feet or less;](ii) the registers are located in the same building as the licensed premises;(iii) the registers comply with the signage, staffing, training, carding, scanning and prohibition on the sharing of data provisions of section 415(a)(8) and (9); and(iv) the board has been provided notice of compliance with this paragraph by the restaurant liquor license holder, including square footage of the building and the location of the specific registers to be used prior to their use.* * *Section 415. Wine Expanded Permits.--(a) * * *(4) If the board has approved the operation of another business which has an inside passage or communication to or with the licensed premises, the display, sale, storage and purchase of wine and malt and brewed beverages shall be [confined strictly to the premises, in a specifically designated area covered by the license.] permitted in any area of the business which is connected to the licensed premises by an interior connection or connections approved by the board. A licensed or unlicensed area or areas that are located within the same building as the licensed premises and operated or controlled by the same licensee, licensee's officers, servants, agents or employes are not required to be contiguous to any other licensed 20250SB0765PN0822 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or unlicensed area. The purchase of goods obtained from the unlicensed area of the premises shall be permitted in the licensed area.* * *(8) [A] Unless presented with a valid armed forces of the United States identification card, a wine expanded permit holder shall utilize a transaction scan device to verify the age of an individual who appears to be under thirty-five years of age [before making a sale of wine] at the point of sale. A wine expanded permit holder may not sell or share data from the use of a transaction scan device, provided that the licensee may use the data to show the enforcement bureau of the board that the licensee is in compliance with this act. As used in this paragraph, the term "transaction scan device" means a device capable of deciphering, in an electronically readable format, the information encoded on the magnetic strip or bar code of an identification card under section 495(a).(9) A sale of wine by a wine expanded permit holder shall be made through a register[, which malt or brewed beverages and restaurant foods sales are made] located on the licensed premises, which is well designated with signage[, which is staffed at all times when patrons are on the licensed premises]. The actual sale shall be conducted by a sales clerk who is at least eighteen years of age [and], has been trained under section 471.1 and [which] utilizes a transaction scan device for the sale as set forth in paragraph (8). A sales clerk who is under eighteen years of age may operate a register if the sales clerk is presented with wine or malt or brewed beverages to be purchased by a customer and obtains the assistance of an employe who is at least eighteen years of age and the sale otherwise 20250SB0765PN0822 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conforms to the requirements under this section. The sale of wine may not occur at a point of sale where the customer scans the customer's own purchases. Sales of wine must occur on the licensed premises. A wine expanded permit holder may use a register that is not located on the licensed portion of the premises but is located within the same building as the licensed premises so long as the sale otherwise conforms to the requirements provided under this subsection.* * *Section 442. Retail Dispensers' Restrictions on Purchases and Sales.--(a) (1) * * *(ii) If a retail dispenser license holder has an interior connection to another business that it operates, the retail dispenser license holder may use one or more of the registers in the other business to sell malt or brewed beverages for off-premises consumption under the following conditions:[(A) the building is eleven thousand square feet or less;](B) the registers are located in the same building as the licensed premises;(C) the registers comply with the signage, staffing, training, carding, scanning and prohibition on the sharing of data provisions of section 415(a)(8) and (9); and(D) the board has been provided notice of compliance with this subparagraph by the retail dispenser license holder, including square footage of the building and the location of the specific registers to be used prior to their use.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0765PN0822 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728